Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1522.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 41-1363, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-1363. Monuments and memorials within governmental mall; legislative authorization; approval; procedure; flags A. Notwithstanding section 34-225 or any other law, a monument or memorial recognizing or honoring a person, group, entity or event shall be located in the governmental mall only if a prior legislative act authorizes the monument or memorial. B. After legislative authorization, a monument or memorial may be established by the following procedures: 1. The proponents shall submit a concept to the legislative council for the design, dimensions and location of the monument or memorial. 2. The legislative council shall review the concept and determine the most appropriate location that highlights the monument or memorial and preserves the integrity of the governmental mall. 3. After recommendations from the historical advisory commission regarding the historical integrity of the monument or memorial and after any necessary negotiations with the proponents, the legislative council shall approve the final design, dimensions, location and maintenance requirements of the monument or memorial, the minimum dollar amount required for deposit in the state monument and memorial repair fund established by section 41-1365 and any statement, declaration, writing or inscription that will be imprinted or stamped on the monument or memorial. 4. Before construction of the monument or memorial begins, the proponents shall enter into a contract with the legislative council specifying the conditions of the design, dimensions and location of the monument or memorial, a list of the artists, contractors and subcontractors that will be employed, the minimum dollar amount required for deposit in the state monument and memorial repair fund established by section 41-1365 and a verification that all employees for the project are insured and that this state is indemnified against any liability in regard to the construction. 5. An approved monument or memorial shall be completed and dedicated to this state within two years after the effective date of the legislative act authorizing the monument or memorial. C. Except as otherwise provided in this section or section 41-1365, all fundraising and the establishment and administration of a fund for deposit of monies and contracts for artistic design and construction of the monument or memorial are the sole responsibility of the proponents. D. If the completed monument or memorial deviates from the final design or dimension that was approved by the legislative council or any statement, declaration, writing or inscription that is imprinted or stamped on the monument or memorial deviates from that which was approved by the legislative council, the proponents are responsible for any costs incurred to conform the monument or memorial to the approved form. E. The proponents shall collect an amount equal to at least ten percent of the artistic design and construction costs of the monument or memorial or the amount approved by the legislative council as provided in subsection B of this section.  The legislative council shall deposit these monies in the state monument and memorial repair fund established by section 41-1365 for the maintenance, repair, reconditioning or relocation of that monument or memorial.  The monies must be deposited in the fund before the beginning of construction of the monument or memorial. F. The legislative council may relocate monuments or memorials that are located in the governmental mall. G. The legislative council shall place in Wesley Bolin plaza the official flags of the twenty-two federally recognized tribes in this state. G. H. This section does not apply to monuments or memorials in which a political subdivision has a contractual interest and that are located in the governmental mall but that are outside Wesley Bolin plaza. END_STATUTE